California, session 20252026, AB2514.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the priority of the state to close pupil academic achievement gaps.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that a dashboard known as the State of the Achievement Gap Dashboard is established as follows:(1) The purpose of the dashboard will be to provide a clear and concise method of informing the public of the state’s progress in implementing the plan to support the efforts of local educational agencies in closing pupil academic achievement gaps.(2) The dashboard will be a mechanism developed by the working group established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52090 of the Education Code, as proposed by Assembly Bill 2225 of the 2025–26 Regular Session.(3) The goal of the dashboard will be to provide an easy to use and easy to understand set of metrics that the public may use to assess the progress the state is making in implementing and advancing its operations and support to help local educational agencies close pupil academic achievement gaps.SEC. 2. Chapter 6.3 (commencing with Section 52100) is added to Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 6.3. State of the Achievement Gap Dashboard52100. The working group established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52090, added by Assembly Bill 2225 of the 2025–26 Regular Session, shall include, as part of the report required to be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 52090, added by Assembly Bill 2225 of the 2025–26 Regular Session, recommendations for the development of a State of the Achievement Gap Dashboard that would be annually updated to assess the state in its progress towards closing pupil academic achievement gaps. The dashboard recommendations shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(a) A series of proposed metrics that assess all of the following:(1) Local support, service quality, and accessibility of supportive state programs.(2) State program evaluation and effectiveness.(3) Operational efficiency, collaboration and communication, and continuous improvement among state entities.(4) Financial support of the state.(5) State transparency and accountability.(6) The department’s governance structure and its programs, policies, regulations, and initiatives.(b) A proposed format for the dashboard.(c) A proposed entity that would be responsible for the design, execution, and maintenance of the dashboard.(d) A proposed dashboard implementation date.SEC. 3. This chapter shall become operative only if Assembly Bill 2225 of the 2025–26 Regular Session is enacted and takes effect on or before January 1, 2027, and adds Section 52090 to the Education Code.